algorithms/indonesian.sbl
// An implementation of the "Porter Stemmer for Bahasa Indonesia" from:
// http://www.illc.uva.nl/Research/Publications/Reports/MoL-2003-02.text.pdf

integers (
    // The paper defines measure as the number of vowels in the word.  We
    // count this initially, then adjust the count each time we remove a
    // prefix or suffix.
    measure

    // Numeric code for the type of prefix removed:
    //
    // 0 other/none
    // 1 'di' or 'meng' or 'ter'
    // 2 'per'
    // 3 'ke' or 'peng'
    // 4 'ber'
    //
    // Some of these have variant forms, so e.g. "meng" includes "men", "me",
    // "meny", "mem".
    //
    // Note that the value of prefix is only used in remove_suffix (and
    // routines it calls) so we don't need to worry about
    // remove_second_order_prefix overwriting a value of prefix set by
    // remove_first_order_prefix since remove_suffix gets called between
    // the two.
    prefix
)

groupings ( vowel )

routines (
    remove_particle
    remove_possessive_pronoun
    remove_first_order_prefix
    remove_second_order_prefix
    remove_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

stringescapes {}

backwardmode (

    define remove_particle as (
        [substring] among (
            'kah' 'lah' 'pun' (delete $measure-=1)
        )
    )

    define remove_possessive_pronoun as (
        [substring] among (
            'ku' 'mu' 'nya' (delete $measure-=1)
        )
    )

    define remove_suffix as (
        [substring] among (
            'an' (
                (
                    // prefix not in {ke, peng, per}. [See SUFFIX_KAN_NOTE]
                    ($prefix != 3 and $prefix != 2)
                    // Remove suffix 'kan'
                    'k']
                ) or (
                    // prefix not in {di, meng, ter}
                    $prefix != 1
                )
            )
            'i' (
                // prefix not in {ke, peng, ber}
                $prefix <= 2
                // word does not end '-si'.  [See SUFFIX_I_NOTE]
                not 's'
            )
        )
        delete $measure-=1
    )

    // SUFFIX_KAN_NOTE:
    // On page 29, the example "kompas Q.31" says "Both Nazief and Porter
    // stemmer converted the word peledakan (blast, explotion [sic]) to
    // ledak (to blast, to explode)".  However, the algorithm as described
    // doesn't behave in this way - grammatically the prefix pe- occurs as a
    // variation of both the first-order derivational prefix peng- and the
    // second-order derivational prefix per-, but table 2.5 doesn't include
    // "pe", only table 2.6 does, so "peledakan" is handled (incorrectly)
    // as having prefix "per" not "peng", and so we remove derivational
    // suffix "kan" rather than "an" to give stem leda.  (Porter-style
    // stemmers remove the longest suffix they can amongst those available,
    // which this paper notes in the last paragraph on page 15).
    //
    // We resolve this by amending the condition on suffix "kan" to
    // "prefix ∉ {ke, peng, per}", which seems to make the stemmer's
    // behaviour match all the examples in the paper except for one:
    // "perbaikan" is shown in table 3.4 as stemming to "bai", but with
    // this change it now stems to "baik".  The table notes that "baik" is
    // the actual root so this deviation is an improvement.  In a sample
    // vocabulary derived from the most common words in id.wikipedia.org,
    // this change only affects 0.12% of words (76 out of 64,587, including
    // "peledakan" and "perbaikan").

    // SUFFIX_I_NOTE:
    // The rest of the condition from the paper is:
    //   V|K...c₁c₁, c₁ ≠ s, c₂ ≠ i
    //
    // The meaning of this is unclear in several ways, and none of the
    // examples given of the stemmer's behaviour in the paper help to
    // resolve these issues.
    //
    // Notice that c₂ isn't actually used - the most obvious explanation
    // seems to be that "c₁c₁" should read "c₁c₂", or maybe "c₂c₁".
    //
    // Elsewhere the paper defines V... as meaning "the stem starts with
    // a vowel" and K... as meaning "the stem starts with a consonant".
    // The meaning of | isn't actually defined, but clearly means
    // alternation.
    //
    // However nowhere is the precedence of | vs ... defined, and there
    // isn't a standard precedence we could reasonably assume.  In other
    // places where the paper says X|Y... it seems the | binds more
    // tightly, so it's (V|K)...cᵢcⱼ not V|(K...cᵢcⱼ).  That seems a bit
    // odd as the first letter must be either a vowel or a consonant, so
    // that really just means "ends cᵢcⱼ" (and has at least one letter
    // before cᵢ but we only call remove_suffix if $measure > 2 which
    // ensures that part).  However, nowhere in the paper uses or defines
    // a notation such as ...X, which may explain this seemingly redundant
    // way of specifying this.
    //
    // The conditions elsewhere on prefix removal (e.g. V...) are clearly
    // on the stem left after the prefix is removed.  None of the other
    // rules for suffix removal have conditions on the stem, but for
    // consistency with the prefix rules we might expect that the cᵢcⱼ
    // test is on what's left *after* removing the "i" suffix.
    //
    // Studying Indonesian wordlists and discussion with a native
    // speaker leads us to conclude that the purpose of this check is to
    // protect words of foreign origin (e.g. "televisi", "organisasi",
    // "komunikasi") from stemming, and the common feature of these is
    // that the word ends "-si", so we conclude that the condition here
    // should be read as "word does not end -si", and this is what we
    // have implemented.
)

define vowel 'aeiou'

define remove_first_order_prefix as (
    [substring] among (
        'di' 'meng' 'me' 'ter'
            (delete $prefix=1 $measure-=1)
        'men' (
            ('y' test vowel ] <-'s' $prefix=1 $measure-=1)
            or
            (delete $prefix=1 $measure-=1)
        )
        'ke' 'peng'
            (delete $prefix=3 $measure-=1)
        'pen' (
            ('y' test vowel ] <-'s' $prefix=3 $measure-=1)
            or
            (delete $prefix=3 $measure-=1)
        )
        'mem' ($prefix=1 $measure-=1 vowel and <-'p' or delete)
        'pem' ($prefix=3 $measure-=1 vowel and <-'p' or delete)
    )
)

define remove_second_order_prefix as (
    // The paper has the condition on removal of prefix "bel" and "pel" as
    // just "ajar" not "ajar..." but it seems that the latter must be what
    // is intended so that e.g. "pelajaran" stems to "ajar" not "lajar".
    // This change only affects a very small number of words (11 out of
    // 64,587) and only for the better.
    [among (
        'pe' (
            ( 'r'] $prefix=2 )
            or
            ( 'l'] 'ajar' )
            or
            ( ] $prefix=2 )
        )
        'be' (
            ( 'r'] )
            or
            ( 'l'] 'ajar')
            or
            ( ] non-vowel 'er' )
            $prefix=4
        )
    )
    // All prefixes we remove here contain exactly one vowel.
    $measure-=1
    delete
)

define stem as (
    $measure = 0
    do ( repeat ( gopast vowel $measure+=1 ) )
    $measure > 2
    $prefix = 0
    backwards (
        do remove_particle
        $measure > 2
        do remove_possessive_pronoun
    )
    $measure > 2
    test (
        remove_first_order_prefix
        do (
            test ($measure > 2 backwards remove_suffix)
            $measure > 2 remove_second_order_prefix
        )
    ) or (
        do remove_second_order_prefix
        do ($measure > 2 backwards remove_suffix)
    )
)
